Oklahoma, session 2025, SB616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 308b of Title 75, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Upon receipt by a state agency of a requirement for an


agency to adopt, follow, or otherwise submit to any new federal rule


or regulation, new interpretation of any rule or regulation, or


change to an existing federal rule or regulation, that agency shall


send the federal rule or regulation by electronic mail to all


members of the Legislature and the Governor.





Req. No. 1416 Page 1


B. The Legislature may disapprove the implementation of any


federal rule or regulation imposed on a state agency by the adoption


of a joint resolution.


C. Unless otherwise authorized by the Legislature, whenever a


rule or regulation is disapproved as provided in subsection B of


this section, the agency subject to such rule or regulation shall


not have authority to follow, interpret, or abide by any


requirements of the rule or regulation as specified by the


Legislature. Any effective rule or regulation which would have been


imposed on an agency when the Legislature was not in session shall


be deemed null and void on the date the Legislature disapproves the


rule or regulation by a joint resolution as provided for in


subsection B of this section. Federal rules and regulations imposed


on state agencies may be disapproved in part or in whole by the


Legislature. Upon enactment of any joint resolution disapproving a


rule or regulation, the agency shall file notice of such legislative


disapproval with the Attorney General.


D. A federal rule or regulation shall be deemed authorized for


state agency compliance if disapproved by a joint resolution


pursuant to subsection B of this section which has been vetoed by


the Governor in accordance with Section 11 of Article VI of the


Oklahoma Constitution and the veto has not been overridden.





Req. No. 1416 Page 2


E. State agencies and their employees complying with the


provisions of this section shall be exempt from liability pursuant


to Section 155 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any


rights, privileges, or interests gained by any person by operation


of a federal rule or regulation applied prior to the adoption of a


joint resolution pursuant to this section. Such rights, privileges,


or interests shall not be affected by reason of any subsequent


disapproval or rejection of such rule or regulation by the


Legislature.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1416 RD 1/19/2025 5:40:07 AM























Req. No. 1416 Page 3